Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Article 5. Drains, Ditches, and Watercourses

§ 950.
Establishment by selectboard.

Selectboard may lay out, establish, construct, or cause to be constructed and maintained a drain, ditch, or watercourse leading from a highway in the town, across the lands of any person to a watercourse, to carry away the surface water from the highway, or other drainage necessary for public health, if it judges the public good or the necessity or convenience of individuals requires this work.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 951.
Damages.

The selectboard shall follow the procedures established in section 923 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 952.
Maintenance.

The town shall properly maintain the drain, ditch, or watercourse and keep it in good and sufficient repair until, upon notice and hearing, it is discontinued.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.